Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 75. Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act
§ 57-75-17.
Powers and duties of public agencies; provision in contracts or agreements between authority and public agency for payment of indebtedness; proceedings upon failure of public agency to pay indebtedness.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, design, undertaking and carrying out of the project or any facility related to the project, any public agency is authorized and empowered upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

To enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, with the authority respecting action to be taken by such public agency with respect to the acquisition, planning, construction, improvement, operation, maintenance or funding of the project or any such facility, and which agreements may include:

The appropriation or payment of funds to the authority or to a trustee in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable the authority to defray any designated portion or percentage of the expenses of administering, planning, designing, constructing, acquiring, improving, operating, and maintaining the project or any facility related to the project,

The appropriation or payment of funds to the authority or to a trustee to pay interest and principal (whether at maturity or upon sinking fund redemption) on bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this act and to fund reserves for debt service, for operation and maintenance and for renewals and replacements, and to fulfill requirements of any covenant with respect to debt service contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to the bonds of the authority issued pursuant to this act,

The furnishing of other assistance in connection with the project or facility related to the project, and

The borrowing of money from the authority in connection with a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii);

To dedicate, sell, donate, convey or lease any property or interest in property to the authority or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to the authority;

To incur the expense of any public improvements made or to be made by such public agency in exercising the powers granted in this section;

To lend, grant or contribute funds to the authority;

To cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational areas, community meeting facilities, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished to or with respect to the project or any such facility;

To furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, upgrade or improve highways, streets, roads, sidewalks, airports, railroads, or ports;

To plan or replan, zone or rezone any parcel of land within the public agency or make exceptions from land use, building and zoning regulations;

To cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the authority, including services pertaining to the acquisition of real property and the furnishing of relocation assistance; and

To loan to the owner, lessee or operator of any project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) the proceeds of any loan from the authority to the public entity under the provisions of this act.

Any contract between a public agency entered into with the authority pursuant to any of the powers granted by this act shall be binding upon said public agency according to its terms, and such public agency shall have the power to enter into such contracts as in the discretion of the governing authorities thereof would be to the best interest of the people of such public agency. Such contracts may include within the discretion of such governing authorities of public agencies defined under Section 57-75-5(h)(ii) a pledge of the full faith and credit of such public agency or any other lawfully available funds for the performance thereof. If at any time title to or possession of the project or any such facility is held by any public body or governmental agency other than the authority, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this act to the contrary, any contract entered into between the authority and any public agency for the appropriation or payment of funds to the authority under item (a)(ii) or (a)(iv) of this section shall contain a provision therein requiring periodic payments by the public agency as required by the authority to pay its indebtedness and, if the public agency is not a county or municipality, such contract shall include as an additional party to the contract the county or municipality (referred to in this paragraph as “levying authority”) that levies and collects taxes for the contracting public agency. If the public agency fails to pay its indebtedness for any month, the authority shall certify to the Department of Revenue, or other appropriate agency, the amount of the delinquency, and the Department of Revenue shall deduct such amount from the public agency’s or levying authority’s, as the case may be, next allocation of sales taxes, petroleum taxes, highway privilege taxes, severance taxes, Tennessee Valley Authority payments in lieu of taxes and homestead exemption reimbursements in that order of priority. The Department of Revenue, or other appropriate agency, shall pay the sums so deducted to the authority to be applied to the discharge of the contractual obligation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, all loans made pursuant to Section 57-75-11(hh) and this section shall be for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, shall, in the sole discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority.

Before authorizing any loan to a public agency defined in Section 57-75-5(h)(ii), a local governmental unit, the governing authority of such local governmental unit in connection with a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii), shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of the loan proposed to be authorized and the purpose for which the loan is to be authorized, and the date upon which the loan will be authorized. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such local governmental unit. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date fixed in such resolution for the authorization of the loan and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days before such date. If no newspaper is published in such local governmental unit, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such local governmental unit and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such local governmental unit. If fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors of the local governmental unit or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is the lesser, file a written protest against the authorization of such loan on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the authorization of such loan shall be called and held as otherwise provided for in connection with the issuance of general obligation indebtedness of such local governmental unit. Notice of such election shall be given as otherwise required in connection with the issuance of general obligation indebtedness of such local governmental unit. If three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors voting in the election vote in favor of authorizing the loan, then the governing authority of the local governmental unit shall proceed with the loan; however, if less than three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors voting in the election vote in favor of authorizing the loan, then the loan shall not be incurred. If no protest be filed, then such loan may be entered into by the local governmental unit without an election on the question of the authorization of such loan, at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the resolution. However, the governing authority of any local governmental unit, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to authorize such loan as provided in this subsection.

Local governmental units may, in connection with any such loan, enter into any covenants and agreements with respect to such local governmental unit’s operations, revenues, assets, monies, funds or property, or such loan, as may be prescribed by the authority.

Upon the making of any such loan by the authority to any local governmental unit, such local governmental unit shall be held and be deemed to have agreed that if such governmental unit fails to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on any such loan as when due and payable, such governmental unit shall have waived any and all defenses to such nonpayment, and the authority, upon such nonpayment, shall thereupon avail itself of all remedies, rights and provisions of law applicable in such circumstance, including without limitation any remedies or rights theretofore agreed to by the local governmental unit, and that such loan shall for all of the purposes of this section, be held and be deemed to have become due and payable and to be unpaid. The authority may carry out the provisions of this section and exercise all of the rights and other applicable laws of this state.

This section shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized by this section and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental to any power conferred by other laws on public agencies and not in derogation of any such powers. Any obligation incurred pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not constitute an indebtedness of the public agency within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation or restriction. For purposes of this act, a public agency shall not be required to comply with the provisions of any other law except as provided in this section.

Any public agency providing any utility service or services, to any project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may enter into leases or subleases for any period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years, in the capacity as lessor or lessee or sublessor or sublessee of lands alone, or lands and facilities located thereon, whether the facilities are owned by the owner of the land, a lessee, sublessee or a third party, and whether the public agency is a lessor, lessee or owner of the land. Any such public agency may also enter into operating agreements and/or lease-purchase agreements with respect to land or utility facilities as owner, operator, lessor or lessee for any period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years. Any such public agency may also enter into contracts for the provision of utilities for any period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years and may set a special rate structure for such utilities.

No well shall be permitted by any public agency responsible for the conservation of oil and gas in the State of Mississippi to be drilled on or under a tract of land which is a part of a project owned or operated by an enterprise as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) and which enterprise is a nonconsenting owner as defined in Section 53-3-7(1), which owns both the surface estate of said tract of land and also owns one hundred percent (100%) of the drilling rights in said tract of land.

No mining activities on or under land which is part of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) shall be permitted by any public agency responsible for mining in the state without the consent of the enterprise owning or operating such project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 9; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 10; Laws, 2004 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 94; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-75-19.
Approval by county, municipality and/or school district for development of project or facility.

The authority shall not undertake to develop any project or facility related to the project within a county, municipality and/or school district without the concurrence of the affected county, municipality and/or school district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).

§ 57-75-21.
Expenditures with certain small business concerns.

The authority shall set a goal to expend not less than ten percent (10%) of the total amounts expended by the authority on planning, construction, training, research, development, testing, evaluation, personal services, procurement, and for the operation and maintenance of any facilities or activities controlled by such authority, with minority small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. For the purpose of determining the total amounts expended with such minority small business concerns, credit shall be given for that portion of any prime contract entered into with the authority which inures to the benefit of such minority small business concern as a subcontractor thereunder.

For the purposes of this section, the term “socially and economically disadvantaged individuals” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C.S., Section 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

For the purposes of this section, the term “minority small business concern” means any small business concern:

Which is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; or, in the case of any publicly owned businesses, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; and

Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of such individuals.

For the purpose of this section, the term “small business concern” shall mean “small business” as the latter term is defined in Section 57-10-155, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In order to comply in a timely manner with its minority small business participation mandate, the authority shall set an annual goal to expend not less than ten percent (10%) of its aggregate yearly expenditures with minority small business concerns.

The authority shall:

Monitor the minority small business concerns assistance programs prescribed in this section.

Review and determine the business capabilities of minority small business concerns.

Establish standards for a certification procedure for minority small business concerns seeking to do business with the authority.

Provide technical assistance services to minority small business concerns. Such technical assistance shall include but not be limited to:

Research;

Assistance in obtaining bonds;

Bid preparation;

Certification of business concerns;

Marketing assistance; and

Joint venture and capital development.

Develop alternative bidding and contracting procedures for minority small business concerns in conjunction with the State Fiscal Management Board and the Governor’s Office of General Services.

Utilize such alternative bidding and contracting procedures in lieu of those prescribed in Title 31, Chapters 5 and 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, when contracting with minority small business concerns that have qualified to bid for contracts and have satisfied any other disclosure provisions required by the authority.

Be authorized to accept in lieu of any bond otherwise required from minority small business concerns or small business concerns contracting with the authority, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the total cost of the contracted project, any combination of the following:

Cash;

Certificates of deposit from any bank or banking corporation insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation;

Federal treasury bills;

Letters of credit issued by a bank as that term is defined in Section 81-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

Surety bonds issued by an insurance company licensed and qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi.

Be authorized, in its discretion, to waive any bond required on any project which does not exceed a total dollar value of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). A retainage shall be held by the authority in an amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) from each draw according to American Institute of Architects (AIA) standards. Upon satisfactory completion of such project, ten percent (10%) of the total cost of the contract shall be held in an interest-bearing escrow account for one (1) year. Funds deposited in such escrow account shall stand as a surety for any defects in workmanship or materials detected within twelve (12) months of completion. The balance of all monies so escrowed including accrued interest shall be paid to the contractor at the end of such twelve-month period.

Be empowered to provide an incentive of bimonthly payments to any prime contractors utilizing minority small business concerns as subcontractors on twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the total dollar value of any single project or contract.

Submit an annual report on its progress concerning minority small business contracts to the Legislature by January 30 of each year.

Take all steps necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).

§ 57-75-22.
Highway projects constructed or improved for certain projects under this chapter to be under jurisdiction of Mississippi Transportation Commission.

Any highways or highway segments constructed or improved by the Mississippi Department of Transportation under the provisions of this chapter for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) shall become a state highway and shall be placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved Nov. 6, 2000.).

§ 57-75-23.
Construction of act.

The provisions of this act are cumulative of other statutes now or hereafter enacted relating to the authority, and the authority may exercise all presently held powers in the furtherance of this act. If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of the provisions of this act is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses and phrases shall in no manner be affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).

§ 57-75-25.
Derivation of income from issuance of bonds by certain persons.

No member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, or any partner or associate of any member of the Legislature, elected official or appointed official, shall derive any income from the issuance of any bonds under this act contrary to the provisions of Section 109, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or Article 3, Chapter 4, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1989).

§ 57-75-27.
Provision of buffer zone for NASA facility in Tishomingo County.

Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 61, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, to the contrary, the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority shall certify to the Department of Economic and Community Development the amount of money necessary for the Major Economic Impact Authority to purchase land in fee simple to provide a buffer zone for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration facility to be constructed in Tishomingo County, which amount shall not be more than Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00); and the department shall, if funds have not otherwise been made available, provide a grant to the authority for such amount out of the proceeds of bonds issued under the Mississippi Business Investment Act. Any funds remaining unexpended after the purchase of land hereunder shall be deposited in the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund. No funds in excess of the amount authorized in this section shall be expended pursuant to the Mississippi Business Investment Act for or in connection with the National Aeronautics and Space Administration facility to be constructed in Tishomingo County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-75-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 423, § 1 eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2002).

[Laws, 1996, ch. 554, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 370, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2002.)]

§ 57-75-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by operation of law, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

[Laws, 1996, ch. 554, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 441, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.]

§ 57-75-33.
Counties and municipalities authorized to enter into agreements with enterprises operating certain projects, providing that no taxes, fees or assessments will be levied upon the enterprise other than those generally levied upon all taxpayers; counties and municipalities authorized to enter into fee in lieu of ad valorem taxes agreements.

The board of supervisors of a county or the governing authorities of a municipality may each enter into an agreement with an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), providing that the county or municipality will not levy any taxes, fees or assessments upon the enterprise other than taxes, fees or assessments that are generally levied upon all taxpayers, or all other taxpayers in the taxing districts in which such project is located, and the board of supervisors or the governing authorities also may each enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement as provided in Section 27-31-104 and/or Section 27-31-105(2). Such agreements may be for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years, except that any fee-in-lieu agreement entered into under this section and Section 27-31-104 and/or Section 27-31-105(2) shall become effective upon its execution by the enterprise and the county board of supervisors and/or municipal governing authorities, as the case may be, in accordance with Section 27-31-104, and continue in effect until all fee-in-lieu periods granted thereunder have expired; however, the period during which any fee-in-lieu may be granted under this section shall not exceed thirty (30) years, and no particular parcel of land, real property improvement or item of personal property shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu for a duration of more than ten (10) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 5; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-75-35.
Counties and municipalities authorized to enter into agreements with enterprises operating certain projects, providing that a county or municipality will approve requests for exemption from ad valorem taxes by supplier.

The board of supervisors of a county or the governing authorities of a municipality may enter into an agreement with an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or 57-75-5 (f)(xxii), providing that the board of supervisors or governing authorities will agree in advance to approve any request for exemption from ad valorem taxes submitted by a supplier of such enterprise in the manner provided by law and that any such exemption shall be for a period of ten (10) years. Such an agreement on the part of the board of supervisors or governing authorities may be for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008).

§ 57-75-37.
Certain counties authorized to contribute or lend funds to enterprises owning or operating certain projects; county may issue bonds to provide funds for such purposes; county may donate property for use in the location, construction, or operation of such projects; additional authority to acquire and contribute project sites, apply for grants and loans for project infrastructure, and enter into certain lease agreements.

(i) Any county in which there is to be constructed a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) is authorized to assist in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing such project by:

1. Contributing a sum of up to Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) to such enterprise for use in connection with the construction of the project; and/or

2. Lending a sum of up to Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) upon such terms as the board of supervisors of such county and such enterprise may agree, the proceeds of which loan shall be used by such enterprise in connection with the construction or financing of the project.

In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (a) (i) of this subsection (1), any such county may appropriate monies from the county’s general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds, or any combination of the foregoing. Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or Section 19-5-99.

The board of supervisors of any county may donate real property for use in the location, construction and/or operation of a project as defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) to one or more economic development authorities, economic development districts, industrial development authorities or similar public agencies created pursuant to state law that engage in economic or industrial development in the county, and any such public agencies may accept such donation of real property from the county. Such public agencies also may transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, real property to be used in the location, construction and/or operation of such a project, and may accept such transfers or donations.

Any county or municipality in which there is to be constructed a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi) or 57-75-5(f)(xxvii) is authorized to:

Acquire the site for such project and contribute the site to the enterprise owning or operating the project;

Apply for grants and loans and utilize the proceeds of such grants and loans for infrastructure related to the project; and

Enter into a lease agreement with the enterprise owning or operating the project for a term not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years.

As used in this subsection:

“Project” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii).

“Public agency” means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority or similar public agency created pursuant to state law that engages in economic or industrial development in the county or a municipality in the county.

Any county in which there is to be located a project is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project. The county may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the board of supervisors of the county, upon such terms as the board of supervisors may agree, to the entity that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection. The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project.

In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any such county may appropriate monies from the county’s general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds, or any combination of the foregoing. Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or Section 19-5-99.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authorities of any public agency may:

Transfer and convey to the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and the authority and the Mississippi Development Authority may accept such transfers or donations;

Transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations; and

Make grants or other contributions of funds to one another for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, the person, entity or other agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the person, agency or other entity seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property.

As used in this subsection:

“Project” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix).

“Public agency” means the county in which the project is located, any municipality located in the county, and/or any economic development authority, economic development district, industrial development authority or similar public agency created pursuant to state law that engages in economic or industrial development in the county or a municipality in the county.

“Board of education” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1.

“Superintendent of education” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 29-3-1.1.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, any public agency is authorized to assist as provided in this paragraph in defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred by the enterprise establishing the project and/or any public agency in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project. Any such public agency may provide such assistance by contributing or lending any sum approved for such purpose by the governing authority of such public agency, upon such terms as the governing authority of such public agency may agree, to the entity or public agency that directly or indirectly incurs or will incur such costs or as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection. The proceeds of the contribution or loan shall be used by the recipient in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, including, without limitation, to defray the costs of site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training, as well as planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other expenses approved by any such public agency.

In order to provide the amounts set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection:

Any such county may appropriate monies from the county’s general funds or provide such amounts from the proceeds of general obligation bonds. Any such county may issue the bonds for such purpose pursuant to the procedures for the issuance of bonds under Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 19-5-99 or in any other manner permitted by any local and private law or other general laws; and

Any public agency may borrow or accept grants of such amounts from the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority for such duration and upon such terms and conditions approved by the governing authority of such public agency and the authority or Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of any public agency may:

1. One another for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of such a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such grants or contributions of funds; and/or

2. A local water association incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and located within such county for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred or to be incurred thereby in connection with water or wastewater-related infrastructure improvements, including an elevated water tank, located within the project area; and

Transfer and convey to the authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and the authority and the Mississippi Development Authority may accept such transfers or donations;

Transfer and convey among themselves, with or without consideration being paid or received, any real and/or personal property for use in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of a project or any facilities or public infrastructure related to the project, and may accept such transfers or donations;

Make grants or other contributions of funds to:

Make one or more periodic grants or other contributions of funds to an enterprise or affiliate thereof owning and/or operating a project in such amount or amounts approved by such governing authority, and enter into an agreement with such enterprise to make such periodic grants or other contributions of funds; however, the duration of any such obligation of the public agency to make such grants or other contributions shall not exceed thirty (30) years.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, the public agency seeking to acquire any real property to be used in connection with the location, construction and/or operation of the project, shall be exempt with respect to such property from the requirements of Section 43-37-3(1)(b) and (c) if the purchase price for such property equals the lowest price negotiated between the owner of the property and the public agency seeking to acquire the property, and at which the owner of the property is willing to sell the property, and any such public agency is further authorized to procure an option to purchase any such real property for such purchase price authorized by this subsection for the lowest option payment at which the owner of the property is willing to grant such option.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, upon the sale of any sixteenth section lands for industrial purposes as provided by law for such project, the board of education controlling such lands, the superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority, on behalf of the state, may sell and convey all minerals in, on and under any such lands for such consideration determined to be adequate by, and upon such terms and conditions prescribed by, such board of education, superintendent of education and the Mississippi Development Authority.

In any county in which there is to be located a project, the governing authority of the applicable public agency may enter into an agreement binding on future governing authorities, for any period not to exceed thirty (30) years to:

Waive any and all fees and expenses associated with building permits and privilege licenses required for the project;

Establish and/or maintain a rate structure for water supplied to the project and wastewater received from the project, which shall be no higher than the lowest tariff prices for such water and wastewater charged to any customer of equal or lesser volume located within the boundaries of the public agency;

Provide firefighting, hazardous materials emergency response, technical rescue and medical response assistance to the enterprise owning or operating the project; and

Require any contractor hired by the public agency for purposes of entering onto the project site for such project to perform work-related to the provision of water supply or wastewater services, to procure customary liability insurance designating the enterprise owning or operating the project as an additional insured and to contractually indemnify such enterprise for any losses incurred by the enterprise as a result of such contractor’s negligence and/or willful acts or omissions arising from the contractor’s entry upon such project site.

The powers and authority granted in this section are an additional, alternative and supplemental method for the doing of the things authorized by this section and are additional and supplemental to, and not in derogation of, any other powers conferred by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 315, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 2010, ch. 405, § 5; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 6; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).